Florida, session 2026, HB1479.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Paragraphs (k) through (m) of subsection (3) of
section 259.105, Florida Statutes, are redesignated as
paragraphs (l) through (n), respectively, paragraph (b) of
subsection (3) is amended, and a new paragraph (k) is added to
that subsection, to read:
259.105 The Florida Forever Act.—
(3) Less the costs of issuing and the costs of funding
Page 1 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1479-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1479 2026
reserve accounts and other costs associated with bonds, the
proceeds of cash payments or bonds issued pursuant to this
section shall be deposited into the Florida Forever Trust Fund
created by s. 259.1051. The proceeds shall be distributed by the
Department of Environmental Protection in the following manner:
(b) Thirty-five percent to the Department of Environmental
Protection for the acquisition of lands and capital project
expenditures described in this section. Of the proceeds
distributed pursuant to this paragraph, it is the intent of the
Legislature that an increased priority be given to those
acquisitions which achieve a combination of conservation goals,
including protecting Florida's water resources and natural
groundwater recharge, or which preserve historic cemeteries that
are included in the Florida Master Site File pursuant to s.
267.21. At a minimum, 3 percent, and no more than 10 percent, of
the funds allocated pursuant to this paragraph shall be spent on
capital project expenditures identified during the time of
acquisition which meet land management planning activities
necessary for public access. Beginning in the 2017-2018 fiscal
year and continuing through the 2026-2027 fiscal year, at least
$5 million of the funds allocated pursuant to this paragraph
shall be spent on land acquisition within the Florida Keys Area
of Critical State Concern as authorized pursuant to s. 259.045.
(k) Subject to legislative appropriation, additional funds
may be allocated for the acquisition of conservation easements
Page 2 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1479-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1479 2026
on historic cemeteries that are included in the Florida Master
Site File pursuant to s. 267.21.
Section 2. Section 704.08, Florida Statutes, is amended to
read:
704.08 Cemeteries; right of ingress and egress for
visiting, or maintenance, research, and searches.—
(1) The relatives and descendants of any person buried in
a cemetery shall have an easement for ingress and egress for the
purpose of visiting the cemetery at reasonable times and in a
reasonable manner. The owner of the land may designate the
easement. If the cemetery is abandoned or otherwise not being
maintained, such relatives and descendants may request the owner
to provide for reasonable maintenance of the cemetery, and, if
the owner refuses or fails to maintain the cemetery, the
relatives and descendants shall have the right to maintain the
cemetery.
(2) If credible evidence supports a determination that
there is an abandoned cemetery located on, underneath, or
adjacent to land owned by a private owner, the state must be
granted an easement for ingress and egress for the purpose of
maintaining and conducting research and noninvasive searches at
such cemetery at reasonable times and in a reasonable manner
after providing the owner with reasonable notice. If the state
determines that an abandoned cemetery exists on such land, the
cemetery must be added to the Florida Master Site File pursuant
Page 3 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1479-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1479 2026
to s. 267.21 and the owner of such land shall be entitled to a
conservation easement for the cemetery.
Section 3. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 4 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1479-00